src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON VIHTTACIHCCETLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#čihččet#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#čihččet#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#čihččet#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#čihččet#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#čihččet#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:đa#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:htta#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:htta#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:đa%>jn#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:htta%>n#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#čihččet#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#čihččet#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta#čihččet#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#čihččet#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta#čihččet#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#čihččet#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta#čihččet#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta#čihččet#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:đa%>t#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:đa%>jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:đa%>jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:đa%>jn#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#čihččet#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#čihččet#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON VIHTTAGAVCCATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#gávccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#gávccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#gávccát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#gávccát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#gávccát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:đa#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:htta#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:htta#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:đa%>jn#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:htta%>n#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#gávccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#gávccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta#gávccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta#gávccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta#gávccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:đa%>t#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:đa%>jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:đa%>jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:đa%>jn#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#gávccát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON VIHTTAOVCCATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#ovccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#ovccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#ovccát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#ovccát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#ovccát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:đa#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:htta#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:htta#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:đa%>jn#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:htta%>n#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#ovccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#ovccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta#ovccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta#ovccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta#ovccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:đa%>t#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:đa%>jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:đa%>jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:đa%>jn#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#ovccát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#logát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta#logát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#logát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#logát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#logát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:đa#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:htta#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:đa#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:đa#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:htta#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:đa%>jn#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:htta%>n#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#logát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#logát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta#logát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta#logát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:đa%>t#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:đa%>jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:đa%>jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:đa%>jn#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#logát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
vihttačihččetlohkái:vi VIHTTACIHCCETLOHKAI ;
vihttagávccátlohkái:vi VIHTTAGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
vihttaovccátlohkái:vi VIHTTAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
vihttalogátlohkái:vi VIHTTALOGATLOHKAI ;
guhttačihččetlohkái:gu VIHTTACIHCCETLOHKAI ;
guhttagávccátlohkái:gu VIHTTAGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
guhttaovccátlohkái:gu VIHTTAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
guhttalogátlohkái:gu VIHTTALOGATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
vihttačihččetlohkái:vi VIHTTACIHCCETLOHKAI ;
vihttagávccátlohkái:vi VIHTTAGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
vihttaovccátlohkái:vi VIHTTAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
vihttalogátlohkái:vi VIHTTALOGATLOHKAI ;
guhttačihččetlohkái:gu VIHTTACIHCCETLOHKAI ;
guhttagávccátlohkái:gu VIHTTAGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
guhttaovccátlohkái:gu VIHTTAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
guhttalogátlohkái:gu VIHTTALOGATLOHKAI ;
